Hawaii statutes.
§431:9-227 Adjuster;
restrictions. An adjuster who is a producer is not permitted to adjust or
cause the adjustment of any loss where the adjuster's remuneration for the sale
of insurance is primarily dependent upon the adjustment of the loss. This section
shall not be applicable to any producer whose remuneration for the sale of
insurance, on December 31, 1955, was primarily dependent upon the adjustment of
losses, or to any producer or an insurer who, on December 31, 1955, was
transacting insurance business where the producer's remuneration for the sale
of such insurance was primarily dependent upon the adjustment of losses. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1997, c 83, §3; am L 2001, c 216, §12; am L 2002, c
155, §22]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next